Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-340.01
Distributor; provide purchaser with invoice.

Each distributor shall, in a manner prescribed by the department, provide each purchaser of a pickle card unit or punchboard with an invoice of sale. The invoice shall contain the purchaser's name and complete address and any other information the department deems necessary.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 37.